Utah statutes.
61-2f-402.   Investigations.

(1)  The division may make an investigation within or outside of this state as the division considers necessary to determine whether a person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter.

(2)  To aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms under this chapter, the division may require or permit a person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as to the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

(3)  For the purpose of the investigation described in Subsection (1), the division or an employee designated by the division may:

(a)  administer an oath or affirmation;

(b)  subpoena witnesses and evidence;

(c)  take evidence;

(d)  require the production of a book, paper, contract, record, other document, or information relevant to the investigation; and

(e)  serve a subpoena by certified mail.

(4) (a)  If a person is found to have violated this chapter or a rule made under this chapter, the person shall pay the costs incurred by the division to copy a book, paper, contract, document, or record required under this chapter, including the costs incurred to copy an electronic book, paper, contract, document, or record in a universally readable format.

(b)  If a person fails to pay the costs described in Subsection (4)(a) when due, the person's license, certification, or registration is automatically suspended:

(i)  beginning the day on which the payment of costs is due; and

(ii)  ending the day on which the costs are paid.

